Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 4
ASSESSMENTS AND FEES

11-102-401. Assessments.

The banking board shall annually establish fees and assessments pursuant to section 11-102-104 (11). Assessments may be made more frequently than annually at the discretion of the banking board.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the banking board shall establish an assessment to be collected at least semiannually in such amounts as are sufficient to generate the moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the division of banking for each such fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1075, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-114 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-402. Administrative fees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1075, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1477, § 38, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-2-114.1 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-403. Division of banking cash fund - creation.

All fees and assessments collected by the banking board shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the division of banking cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. All money in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the activities of the banking board and the division. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any money not appropriated shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1076, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1406), ch. 178, p. 811, § 6, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2795, § 8, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-114.5 as it existed prior to 2003.